California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(F) The aggregate interest, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), in vacation credits or accrued, or unused, vacation pay, sick leave, family leave, or wages, as defined in Section 200 of the Labor Code.

(11) The debtor’s right to receive, or property that is traceable to, any of the following:

(A) An award under a crime victim’s reparation law.

(B) A payment under a settlement agreement arising out of or regarding the debtor’s employment, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor, the debtor’s spouse, or a dependent of the debtor.

(C) A payment on account of the wrongful death of an individual of whom the debtor was a dependent, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor.

(D) A payment under a life insurance contract that insured the life of an individual of whom the debtor was a spouse or dependent on the date of that individual’s death, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor.

(E) A payment, not to exceed twenty-nine thousand two hundred seventy-five dollars ($29,275) on account of personal bodily injury of the
 debtor, the debtor’s spouse,
 or an individual of whom the debtor is a dependent.

(F) A payment in compensation of loss of future earnings of the debtor or an individual of whom the debtor is or was a spouse or dependent, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and the debtor’s spouse or a dependent of the debtor.

(12) Money held in an account owned by the judgment debtor and established pursuant to the Golden State Scholarshare Trust Act (Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code), subject to the following limits:

(A) The amount exempted for contributions to an account during the 365-day period prior to the date of filing of the debtor’s petition for bankruptcy, in the aggregate during this period, shall not exceed the amount of the annual gift tax exclusion under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in effect at the time of the filing of the debtor’s petition for bankruptcy.

(B) The amount exempted for contributions to an account during the period commencing 730 days prior to and ending 366 days prior to the date of filing of the debtor’s petition for bankruptcy, in the aggregate during this period, shall not exceed the amount of the annual gift tax exclusion under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in effect at the time of the filing of the debtor’s petition for bankruptcy.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “account” includes all accounts having the same beneficiary.

(D) This paragraph is not subject to the requirements of Section 703.150.

(c) In a case under Title 11 of the United States Code, the value of the property claimed as exempt and the debtor’s exemptions provided by this chapter with respect to such property shall be determined as of the date the bankruptcy petition is filed. In a case where the debtor’s equity in a residence is less than or equal to the amount of the debtor’s allowed homestead exemption as of the date the bankruptcy petition is filed, any appreciation in the value of the debtor’s interest in the property during the pendency of the case is exempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

703.150.

(a) On April 1, 2004, and at each three-year interval ending on April 1 thereafter, the dollar amounts of exemptions provided in subdivision (b) of Section 703.140 in effect immediately before that date shall be adjusted as provided in subdivision (d).

(b) On April 1, 2007, and at each three-year interval ending on April 1 thereafter, the dollar amounts of exemptions provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 704.010) in effect immediately before that date shall be adjusted as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) On April 1, 2022, and at each three-year interval ending on April 1 thereafter, the dollar amount set forth in
 paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 699.730 in effect immediately before that date shall be adjusted as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) The Judicial Council shall determine the amount of the adjustment based on the change in the annual California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, published by the Department of Industrial Relations, for the most recent three-year period ending on December 31 preceding the adjustment, with each adjusted amount rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) Beginning April 1, 2004, the Judicial Council shall publish a list of the current dollar amounts of exemptions provided in subdivision (b) of Section 703.140 and in Article 3 (commencing with Section 704.010), and the dollar amount set forth in paragraph (7) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 699.730, together with the date of the next scheduled adjustment.

(f) Adjustments made under subdivision (a) do not apply with respect to cases commenced before the date of the adjustment, subject to any contrary rule applicable under the federal Bankruptcy Code. The applicability of adjustments made under subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) is governed by Section 703.050.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 23.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure for Claiming Exemptions After Levy [703.510. - 703.610.]

703.510.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, property that has been levied upon may be claimed to be exempt as provided in this article.

(b) If property in a deposit account that is exempt without making a claim, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 704.080 or subdivision (a) of Section 704.220, is levied upon, the property shall be released by the financial institution holding the judgment debtor’s deposit account within five business days of the financial institution receiving written notice from the judgment debtor setting forth the facts
 supporting the exemption without the necessity of making a claim under this title. The judgment debtor’s written notice to the financial institution shall be served via first-class mail on the judgment creditor or judgment creditor’s attorney of record within five business days of notice being sent by the judgment debtor to the financial institution. The written notice shall be addressed to the financial institution identified pursuant to
 subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 684.110.

(c) If property that is exempt without making a claim is levied upon, other than the property in a deposit account described in subdivision (b),
 the property may be released pursuant to the exemption procedure provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 3.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

703.520.

(a) The claimant may make a claim of exemption by filing with the levying officer, either in person or by mail, a claim of exemption together with a copy of the claim. If the claimant is personally served, the claim shall be made within 15 days after the date the notice of levy on the property claimed to be exempt is served on the judgment debtor. If the claimant is served by mail, the claim shall be made within 20 days after the date the notice of levy on the property claimed to be exempt is served on the judgment debtor. If the claim is filed by mail and assigned a tracking number by the United States Postal Service or another common carrier, the filing shall be deemed complete on the date the claim is postmarked. If the claim is filed by mail and not assigned a tracking number, the filing shall be deemed complete on the date
 the claim is received by the levying officer.

(b) The claim of exemption shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(1) The name of the claimant and the mailing address where service of a notice of opposition to the claim may be made upon the claimant.

(2) The name and last known address of the judgment debtor if the claimant is not the judgment debtor.

(3) A description of the property claimed to be exempt. If an exemption is claimed pursuant to Section 704.010 or 704.060, the claimant shall describe all other property of the same type, including exempt proceeds of the property of the same type, owned by the judgment debtor alone or in combination with others on the date of levy and identify the property, whether or not levied
 upon, to which the exemption is to be applied. If an exemption is claimed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 704.100, the claimant shall state the nature and amount of all other property of the same type owned by the judgment debtor or the spouse of the judgment debtor alone or in combination with others on the date of levy.

(4) A financial statement if required by Section 703.530.

(5) A citation of the provision of this chapter or other statute upon which the claim is based.

(6) A statement of the facts necessary to support the claim.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for a personal debt as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, a claimant may file a claim of exemption more than 20 days after the date the notice of levy is served on the
 judgment debtor pursuant to Sections 703.580 and 706.105. The levying officer may, nonetheless, release the funds to the judgment creditor at any time after the expiration of the 20-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 708, Sec. 4.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

703.530.

(a) If property is claimed as exempt pursuant to a provision exempting property to the extent necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor, the claim of exemption shall include a financial statement.

(b) The financial statement shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the spouse of the judgment debtor.

(2) The name, age, and relationship of all persons
 dependent upon the judgment debtor or the spouse of the judgment debtor for support.

(3) All sources and the amounts of earnings and other income of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(4) A list of the assets of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor and the value of such assets.

(5) All outstanding obligations of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(c) The financial statement shall be executed under oath by the judgment debtor and, unless the spouses are living separate and apart, by the spouse of the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.540.

Promptly after the filing of the claim of exemption, the levying officer shall serve both of the following on the judgment creditor personally or by mail:

(a) A copy of the claim of exemption.

(b) A notice of claim of exemption stating that the claim of exemption has been made and that the levying officer will release the property unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, both of the following are filed with the levying officer:

(1) A copy
 of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption.

(2) A copy of the notice of motion for an order determining the claim of exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.550.

(a) Within 15 days after service of the notice of claim of exemption, a judgment creditor who opposes the claim of exemption shall file with the court a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption and a notice of motion for an order determining the claim of exemption and shall file with the levying officer a copy of the notice of opposition and a copy of the notice of motion. Upon the filing of the copies of the notice of opposition and notice of motion, the levying officer shall promptly file the claim of exemption with the court. If copies of the notice of opposition and notice of motion are not filed with the levying officer within the time allowed, the levying officer shall immediately release the property
 to the extent it is claimed to be exempt.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 552, Sec. 6.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

703.560.

The notice of opposition to the claim of exemption shall be executed under oath and shall include both of the following:

(a) An allegation either (1) that the property is not exempt under the provision of this chapter or other statute relied upon or (2) that the equity in the property claimed to be exempt is in excess of the amount provided in the applicable exemption.

(b) A statement of the facts necessary to support the allegation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.570.

(a) (1) The hearing on the motion shall be held not later than 30 days from the date the notice of motion was filed with the court unless continued by the court for good cause. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, if the hearing is delayed by the court and cannot be set within 30 days of notice of the motion, a party may seek by ex parte application, and the court shall issue, an order staying any levy or garnishment with respect to the property subject to the claim of exemption until the hearing occurs.

(2) The filing of an ex parte application under this section is not a general appearance and shall not constitute a waiver of the right to bring a motion
 under Section 418.10.

(b) Not less than 10 days prior to the hearing, the judgment creditor shall serve a notice of the hearing and a copy of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption on the claimant and on the judgment debtor, if other than the claimant. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 708, Sec. 5.   (AB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

703.580.

(a) The claim of exemption and notice of opposition to the claim of exemption do not constitute an appearance pursuant to Section 1014. The power of the court over the exemption claimant is limited to determining the claim of exemption.

(b) At a hearing under this section, the exemption claimant has the burden of proof.

(c) The claim of exemption is deemed controverted by the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption and both shall be received in evidence. If no other evidence is offered, the court, if satisfied that sufficient facts are shown by the claim of exemption (including the financial statement if one is required) and the notice of opposition, may make its determination thereon. If a claim of exemption asserts that money in a judgment debtor’s deposit account is or was necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor as provided in Section 704.225, the court shall review the judgment debtor’s financial statement and make findings thereon. If
 not satisfied, the court
 may order the hearing continued for the production of other evidence, oral or documentary.

(d) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine by order whether or not the property is exempt in whole or in part.

(1) Subject to Section 703.600, the order is determinative of the right of the judgment creditor to apply the property to the satisfaction of the judgment.

(2) Where the judgment
 upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the court shall order the return of any property that was exempt without the need for a claim and that was levied upon within the 12 months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption. This paragraph does not limit a judge’s authority to order, for good cause, the return of any exempt property taken more than 12 months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption.

(3) Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the court shall order the return of any property that the debtor has demonstrated would have been exempt by claim of exemption and that was levied upon within the six months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption. This paragraph does not limit a judge’s authority to order, for good cause, the return of any exempt
 property taken more than six months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption.

(4) If property is exempt without the need for a claim under this title or as a result of a claim of exemption, the court shall order the return of the exempt property from the levying officer, judgment creditor, or other person who is in possession of the property, to the judgment debtor. A levying officer shall return the exempt property within 20 business days of receipt of notice of the order. A judgment creditor shall return the exempt property within 10 business days of entry of the order.

(e) The court clerk shall promptly transmit a certified copy of the order to the levying officer. Subject to Section 703.610, the levying officer shall, in compliance with the order, release the property or apply the property to the satisfaction of the money judgment.

(f) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, if an exemption is not determined within the time provided by Section 703.570, the property claimed to be exempt shall be released.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

703.590.

If the court extends the time allowed for an act to be done under this article, written notice of the extension shall be filed with the levying officer and, unless notice is waived, shall be served promptly on the opposing party. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

703.600.

An appeal lies from any order made under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 93.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

703.610.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute or ordered by the court, the levying officer shall not release, sell, or otherwise dispose of the property for which an exemption is claimed until an appeal is waived, the time to file an appeal has expired, or the exemption is finally determined.

(b) At any time while the exemption proceedings are pending, upon motion of the judgment creditor or a claimant, or upon its own motion, the court may make any orders for disposition of the property that may be proper under the circumstances of the case, except that such order may not require the release to the judgment creditor of property that would be exempt
 without a claim of exemption. The order may be modified or vacated by the court at any time during the pendency of the exemption proceedings upon any terms that are just, except that such order may not require the release to the judgment creditor of property that would be exempt without a claim of exemption.

(c) If an appeal of the determination of a claim of exemption is taken, notice of the appeal shall be given to the levying officer and the levying officer shall hold, release, or dispose of the property in accordance with the provisions governing enforcement and stay of enforcement of money judgments pending appeal. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, if an earnings withholding order has been served upon the judgment debtor’s employer, notice of
 the appeal shall also be given to the judgment debtor’s employer who shall, upon receipt of the notice, immediately suspend any further garnishment of the judgment debtor’s wages for the pendency of the appeal and until ordered by the court to resume garnishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 6.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exempt Property [704.010. - 704.235.]

704.010.

(a) Any combination of the following is exempt in the amount of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500):

(1) The aggregate equity in motor vehicles.

(2) The proceeds of an execution sale of a motor vehicle.

(3) The proceeds of insurance or other indemnification for the loss, damage, or destruction of a motor vehicle.

(b) Proceeds exempt under subdivision (a) are exempt for a period of 90 days after the time the proceeds are actually received by the judgment debtor.

(c) For the purpose of determining the equity, the fair market value of a motor vehicle shall be determined by reference to used car price guides customarily used by California automobile dealers unless the motor vehicle is not listed in such price guides.

(d) If the judgment debtor has only one motor vehicle and it is sold at an execution sale, the proceeds of the execution sale are exempt in the amount of
 seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) without making a claim. The levying officer shall consult and may rely upon the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles in determining whether the judgment debtor has only one motor vehicle. In the case covered by this subdivision, the exemption provided by subdivision (a) is not available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

704.020.

(a) Household furnishings, appliances, provisions, wearing apparel, and other personal effects are exempt in the following cases:

(1) If ordinarily and reasonably necessary to, and personally used or procured for use by, the judgment debtor and members of the judgment debtor’s family at the judgment debtor’s principal place of residence.

(2) Where the judgment debtor and the judgment debtor’s spouse live separate and apart, if ordinarily and reasonably necessary to, and personally used or procured
 for use by, the spouse and members of the spouse’s family at the spouse’s principal place of residence.

(b) In determining whether an item of property is “ordinarily and reasonably necessary” under subdivision (a), the court shall take into account both of the following:

(1) The extent to which the particular type of item is ordinarily found in a household.

(2) Whether the particular item has extraordinary value as compared to the value of items of the same type found in other households.

(c) If an item of property for which an exemption is claimed pursuant to this section is an item of the type ordinarily found in a household but is determined not to be exempt because the item has extraordinary value as compared to the value of items of the same type
 found in other households, the proceeds obtained at an execution sale of the item are exempt in the amount determined by the court to be a reasonable amount sufficient to purchase a replacement of ordinary value if the court determines that a replacement is reasonably necessary. Proceeds exempt under this subdivision are exempt for a period of 90 days after the proceeds are actually received by the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.030.

Material that in good faith is about to be applied to the repair or improvement of a residence is exempt if the equity in the material does not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) in the following cases:

(a) If purchased in good faith for use in the repair or improvement of the judgment debtor’s principal place of residence.

(b) Where the judgment debtor and the judgment debtor’s spouse live separate and apart, if purchased in good faith for use in the repair or improvement of the spouse’s principal place of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 81, Sec. 3.   (SB 898)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.040.

Jewelry, heirlooms, and works of art are exempt to the extent that the aggregate equity therein does not exceed eight thousand seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,725).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 81, Sec. 4.   (SB 898)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.050.

(a) Health aids reasonably necessary to enable the judgment debtor or the spouse or a dependent of the judgment debtor to work or sustain health, and prosthetic and orthopedic appliances, are exempt.

(b) Health aids described in subdivision (a) include vehicles converted for use by the debtor, the debtor’s spouse, or a dependent of the debtor, who has a disability. Conversion of a vehicle for use by a person who has a disability includes altering the interior, installing steering, a wheelchair lift, or motorized steps, or modifying the operation of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

704.060.

(a) Tools, implements, instruments, materials, uniforms, furnishings, books, equipment, one commercial motor vehicle, one vessel, and other personal property are exempt to the extent that the aggregate equity therein does not exceed:

(1) Eight thousand seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,725), if reasonably necessary to and actually used by the judgment debtor in the exercise of the trade, business, or profession by which the judgment debtor earns a livelihood.

(2) Eight thousand seven hundred
 twenty-five dollars ($8,725), if reasonably necessary to and actually used by the spouse of the judgment debtor in the exercise of the trade, business, or profession by which the spouse earns a livelihood.

(3) Twice the amount of the exemption provided in paragraph (1), if reasonably necessary to and actually used by the judgment debtor and by the spouse of the judgment debtor in the exercise of the same trade, business, or profession by which both earn a livelihood. In the case covered by this paragraph, the exemptions provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) are not available.

(b) If property described in subdivision (a) is sold at an execution sale, or if it has been lost, damaged, or destroyed, the proceeds of the execution sale or of insurance or other indemnification are exempt for a period of 90 days after the proceeds are actually received by the judgment debtor or the judgment
 debtor’s spouse. The amount exempt under this subdivision is the amount specified in subdivision (a) that applies to the particular case less the aggregate equity of any other property to which the exemption provided by subdivision (a) for the particular case has been applied.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a motor vehicle is not exempt under subdivision (a) if there is a motor vehicle exempt under Section 704.010 which is reasonably adequate for use in the trade, business, or profession for which the exemption is claimed under this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b):

(1) The amount of the exemption for a commercial motor vehicle under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) is limited to four thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($4,850).

(2) The amount of the exemption for a commercial motor vehicle under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is limited to twice the amount of the exemption provided in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 11.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

704.070.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Earnings withholding order” means an earnings withholding order under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) (Wage Garnishment Law).

(2) “Paid earnings” means earnings as defined in Section 706.011 that were paid to the employee during the 30-day period ending on the date of the levy. For the purposes of this paragraph, where earnings that have been paid to the employee are sought to be subjected to the enforcement of a money judgment other than by a levy, the date of levy is deemed to be the date the earnings were otherwise subjected to the
 enforcement of the judgment.

(3) “Earnings assignment order for support” means an earnings assignment order for support as defined in Section 706.011.

(b) Paid earnings that can be traced into deposit accounts or in the form of cash or its equivalent as provided in Section 703.080 are exempt in the following amounts:

(1) All of the paid earnings are exempt if prior to payment to the employee they were subject to an earnings withholding order or an earnings assignment order for support.

(2) Disposable earnings that would otherwise not be subject to levy under Section 706.050 that are levied upon or otherwise sought to be subjected to the enforcement of a money
 judgment are exempt if prior to payment to the employee they were not subject to an earnings withholding order or an earnings assignment order for support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 552, Sec. 7.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

704.080.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Deposit account” means a deposit account in which payments of public benefits or social security benefits are directly deposited by the government or its agent.

(2) “Social security benefits” means payments authorized by the Social Security Administration for regular retirement and survivors’ benefits, supplemental security income benefits, coal miners’ health benefits, and disability insurance benefits. “Public benefits” means aid payments authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, payments
 for supportive services as described in Section 11323.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and general assistance payments made pursuant to Section 17000.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) A deposit account is exempt without making a claim in the following amount:

(1) One thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750) where one depositor is the designated payee of the directly deposited public benefits payments.

(2) Three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) where one depositor is the designated payee of directly deposited social security payments.

(3) Two thousand six hundred dollars ($2,600) where two or more depositors are the
 designated payees of the directly deposited public benefits payments, unless those depositors are joint payees of directly deposited payments that represent a benefit to only one of the depositors, in which case the exemption under paragraph (1) applies.

(4) Five thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250) where two or more depositors are the designated payees of directly deposited social security payments, unless those depositors are joint payees of directly deposited payments that represent a benefit to only one of the depositors, in which case the exemption under paragraph (2) applies.

(c) The amount of a deposit account that exceeds the exemption provided in subdivision (b) is exempt to the extent that it consists of payments of public benefits or social security
 benefits.

(d) Notwithstanding Article 5 (commencing with Section 701.010) of Chapter 3, when a deposit account is levied upon or otherwise sought to be subjected to the enforcement of a money judgment, the financial institution that holds the deposit account shall either place the amount that exceeds the exemption provided in subdivision (b) in a suspense account or otherwise prohibit withdrawal of that amount pending notification of the failure of the judgment creditor to file the affidavit required by this section or the judicial determination of the exempt status of the amount. Within 10 business days after the levy, the financial institution shall provide the levying officer with a written notice stating (1) that the deposit account is one in which payments of public benefits or social security benefits are directly deposited by the
 government or its agent and (2) the balance of the deposit account that exceeds the exemption provided by subdivision (b). Promptly upon receipt of the notice, the levying officer shall serve the notice on the judgment creditor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(e) Notwithstanding the procedure prescribed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510), whether there is an amount exempt under subdivision (c) shall be determined as follows:

(1) Within five days after the levying officer serves the notice on the judgment creditor under subdivision (d), a judgment creditor who desires to claim that the amount is not exempt shall file with the court an affidavit alleging that the amount is not exempt and file a copy with the levying officer. The affidavit shall be in the form
 of the notice of opposition provided by Section 703.560, and a hearing shall be set and held, and notice given, as provided by Sections 703.570 and 703.580. For the purpose of this subdivision, the “notice of opposition to the claim of exemption” in Sections 703.570 and 703.580 means the affidavit under this subdivision.

(2) If the judgment creditor does not file the affidavit with the levying officer and give notice of hearing pursuant to Section 703.570 within the time provided in paragraph (1), the levying officer shall release the deposit account and shall notify the financial institution.

(3) The affidavit constitutes the pleading of the judgment creditor, subject to the power of the court to permit amendments in the interest of justice. The affidavit is deemed controverted and no
 counteraffidavit is required.

(4) At a hearing under this subdivision, the judgment debtor has the burden of proving that the excess amount is exempt.

(5) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court by order shall determine whether or not the amount of the deposit account is exempt pursuant to subdivision (c) in whole or in part and shall make an appropriate order for its prompt disposition. No findings are required in a proceeding under this subdivision.

(6) Upon determining the exemption claim for the deposit
 account under subdivision (c), the court shall immediately transmit a certified copy of the order of the court to the financial institution and to the levying officer. If the order determines that all or part of the excess is exempt under subdivision (c), with respect to the amount of the excess which is exempt, the financial institution shall transfer the exempt excess from the suspense account or otherwise release any restrictions on its withdrawal by the judgment debtor. The transfer or release shall be effected within three business days of the receipt of the certified copy of the court order by the financial institution.

(f) If the judgment debtor claims that a portion of the amount is exempt other than pursuant to subdivision (c), the claim of exemption shall be made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section
 703.510). If the judgment debtor also opposes the judgment creditor’s affidavit regarding an amount exempt pursuant to
 subdivision (c), both exemptions shall be determined at the same hearing, provided the judgment debtor has complied with Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (SB 898)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.090.

(a) The funds of a judgment debtor confined in a prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority or confined in any county or city jail, road camp, industrial farm, or other local correctional facility, held in trust for or to the credit of the judgment debtor, in an inmate’s trust account or similar account by the state, county, or city, or any agency thereof, are exempt without making a claim in the amount of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750). If the judgment debtor is married, each spouse is entitled to a separate exemption under this section or the spouses may combine their exemptions.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the judgment is for a restitution fine or order imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative on or before September 28, 1994, or Section 1203.04 of the Penal Code, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, the funds held in trust for, or to the credit of, a judgment debtor described in subdivision (a) are exempt in the amount of three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) without making a claim. The exemption provided in this subdivision is not subject to adjustment under Section 703.150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (SB 898)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.100.

(a) Unmatured life insurance policies (including endowment and annuity policies), but not the loan value of such policies, are exempt without making a claim.

(b) The aggregate loan value of unmatured life insurance policies (including endowment and annuity policies) is subject to the enforcement of a money judgment but is exempt in the amount of thirteen thousand nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($13,975). If the judgment debtor is married, each spouse is entitled to a separate exemption under this subdivision, and the exemptions of the spouses may be combined, regardless of whether the policies belong to either or both spouses and regardless of
 whether the spouse of the judgment debtor is also a judgment debtor under the judgment. The exemption provided by this subdivision shall be first applied to policies other than the policy before the court and then, if the exemption is not exhausted, to the policy before the court.

(c) Benefits from matured life insurance policies (including endowment and annuity policies) are exempt to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (SB 898)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.105.

Money held in an account owned by the judgment debtor and established pursuant to the Golden State Scholarshare Trust Act (Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code) is exempt without making a claim, subject to the following limitations:

(a) The amount exempted for contributions to an account during the 365-day period prior to the date of entry of a money judgment, in the aggregate during this period, shall not exceed the amount of the annual gift tax exclusion under Section
 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in effect at the time of entry of the money judgment.

(b) The amount exempted for contributions to an account during the period commencing 730 days prior to and ending 366 days prior to the date of entry of a money judgment, in the aggregate during this period, shall not exceed the amount of the annual gift tax exclusion under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in effect at the time of entry of the money judgment.
